Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-127
Drainage improvements; bonds; sale; lien; registration.

All bonds shall be sold at not less than par and shall be and remain a first lien upon the property found to be benefited, each part and parcel to remain under such lien until the amount apportioned thereto shall be paid. All bonds shall be registered as provided by law for the registration of municipal bonds.

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 21, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 1744;

C.S.1922, § 1691;

C.S.1929, § 31-127;

R.S.1943, § 31-127.